Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 1. Emergency Management Law.
§ 33-15-15.
Mobile support units.

The agency is authorized to provide, within or without the state, such support from available personnel, equipment and other resources of state agencies and the political subdivisions of the state as may be necessary to reinforce emergency management agencies in areas stricken by emergency. Such support shall be rendered with due consideration of the plans of the federal government, this state, the other states and of the criticalness of the existing situation. Emergency management support forces shall be called to duty upon orders of the agency and shall perform their functions in any part of the state, or, upon the conditions specified in this section, in other states.

Personnel of emergency management support forces while on duty, whether within or without the state, shall:

If they are employees of the state, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment;

If they are employees of a political subdivision of the state, and whether serving within or without such political subdivision, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; and

If they are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, be entitled to compensation by the state at a rate commensurate with their duties and responsibilities and to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this state.

All personnel of emergency management support forces shall, while on duty, be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of emergency management activities in the area in which they are serving, and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses, and for death, disability or injury to such personnel while on such emergency duty as a member of an emergency management support force, the state shall pay compensation to the heirs in event of death or the individual in event of injury or disability in accordance with payment schedules contained in the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Law.

The state shall reimburse a political subdivision for the actual and necessary travel, subsistence and maintenance expenses of employees of such political subdivision while serving as members of an emergency management support force, and for all payments for death, disability or injury of such employees incurred in the course of such duty, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of such political subdivision resulting from the operation of such emergency management support force. The state may also reimburse a political subdivision for employees’ overtime while deployed as members of an emergency management support force and backfill of deployed forces when determined by the director to be necessary to avoid serious financial consequences for the political subdivision providing support and when requested by the chief elected official of the political subdivision stating the circumstances for the request.

Whenever an emergency management support force of another state shall render aid in this state pursuant to the orders of the governor of its home state and upon the request of the Governor of this state, the personnel thereof shall have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities of emergency management personnel serving in similar capacities in this state, except compensation, and this state shall reimburse such other state for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence and maintenance expenses of the personnel of such emergency management support force while rendering such aid, and for all payments for death, disability or injury of such personnel incurred in the course of rendering such aid, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of such other state or a political subdivision thereof resulting from the rendering of such aid; provided, that the laws of such other state contain provisions substantially similar to this section.

No personnel of emergency management support forces of this state shall be ordered by the Governor to operate in any other state unless the laws of such other state contain provisions substantially similar to this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 8; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2006).

§ 33-15-17.
Local organization of emergency management.

Each county and municipality, or counties and the municipalities therein acting jointly, or two (2) or more counties acting jointly, of this state are hereby authorized and directed to establish a local organization for emergency management in accordance with the state emergency management plan and program, if required and authorized so to do by such state emergency management plan. Each local organization for emergency management shall have a director who shall be appointed by the governing body of the political subdivision, or political subdivisions acting jointly, and who shall have direct responsibility for the organization, administration and operation of such local organization for emergency management, subject to the direction and control of such governing body. Each local organization for emergency management shall perform emergency management functions within the territorial limits of the political subdivision within which it is organized, and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside of such territorial limits as may be required pursuant to the provisions of the state emergency management plan. Each county shall develop an emergency management plan and program that is coordinated and consistent with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and program. Counties that are part of an interjurisdictional emergency management agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall cooperatively develop an emergency management plan and program that is coordinated and consistent with the state emergency management plan and program.

In carrying out the provisions of this article each county and municipality, or the two (2) acting jointly, or two (2) or more counties acting jointly, where there is joint organization, in which any disaster as described in Section 33-15-5 occurs, shall have the power to enter into contracts and incur obligations necessary to combat such disaster, protecting the health and safety of persons and property, and providing emergency assistance to the victims of such disaster. Each county and municipality is authorized to exercise the powers vested under this section in the light of the exigencies of the extreme emergency situation without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law pertaining to the performance of public work, entering into contracts, the incurring of obligations, the employment of temporary workers, the rental of equipment, the purchase of supplies and materials, the levying of taxes and the appropriation and expenditure of public funds.

Each county and each municipality, or two (2) or more counties acting jointly, shall have the power and authority:

To appropriate and expend funds, make contracts, obtain and distribute equipment, materials, and supplies for emergency management purposes; provide for the health and safety of persons and property, including emergency assistance to the victims of any enemy attack or man-made, technological or natural disasters; and to direct and coordinate the development of emergency management plans and programs in accordance with the policies and plans set by the federal and state emergency management agencies;

To appoint, employ, remove, or provide, with or without compensation, air raid wardens, rescue teams, auxiliary fire and police personnel, and other emergency management workers;

To establish, as necessary, a primary and one or more secondary emergency operating centers to provide continuity of government, and direction and control of emergency operation during an emergency;

To donate public funds, supplies, labor and equipment to assist any governmental entity in a county or municipality in which a disaster as described in Section 33-15-5 occurs;

Subject to the order of the Governor, or the chief executive of the political subdivision, to assign and make available for duty, the employees, property or equipment of the subdivision relating to firefighting, engineering, rescue, health, medical and related services, police, transportation, construction, and similar items or services for emergency management purposes either within or outside of the limits of the subdivision;

Subject to the order of the chief executive of the county or municipality or the Governor to order the evacuation of any area subject to an impending or existing enemy attack or man-made, technological or natural disaster;

Subject to the order of the chief executive of the county or municipality or the Governor, to control or restrict egress, ingress and movement within the disaster area to the degree necessary to facilitate the protection of life and property;

To enter into mutual aid agreements in the manner authorized by Section 33-15-19.

A local emergency as defined in Section 33-15-5 may be proclaimed by the mayor or governing body of a municipality, or the president of the board of supervisors of a county or the governing body of a county. In the event a local emergency is proclaimed by the mayor of a municipality or the president of the board of supervisors of a county, the governing body of such municipality or the governing body of such county shall review and approve or disapprove the need for continuing the local emergency at its first regular meeting following such proclamation or at a special meeting legally called for such review. Thereafter, the governing body of such municipality or the governing body of such county shall review the need for continuing the local emergency at least every thirty (30) days until such local emergency is terminated, and shall proclaim the termination of such local emergency at the earliest possible date that conditions warrant. During a local emergency, the governing body of a political subdivision may promulgate orders and regulations necessary to provide for the protection of life and property, including orders or regulations imposing a curfew within designated boundaries where necessary to preserve the public order and safety. Such orders and regulations and amendments and rescissions thereof shall be in writing and shall be given widespread notice and publicity. The authorization granted by this section to impose a curfew shall not be construed as restricting in any manner the existing authority to impose a curfew pursuant to police power for any other lawful purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-09; Laws, 1942, ch. 206; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 9; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 9; Laws, 1983, ch. 420, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 9; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 20, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 359, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012; Laws, 2019, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 33-15-19.
Mutual aid arrangements.

The governing body of a municipality or county of the state is authorized to participate in the Statewide Mutual Aid Compact (SMAC) established by the agency as a mechanism to standardize mutual aid arrangements between jurisdictions within the state. The agency is authorized to present the SMAC to the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians’ Tribal Council for its consideration and approval. SMAC provides guidelines for requesting and receiving mutual aid, liability protection and reimbursement procedures for providing such aid. The governing body of each political subdivision of the state is strongly encouraged to sign and ratify the SMAC for mutual aid between their jurisdiction and other cities or counties within the state as well as the Mississippi Band of the Choctaw Indians. A copy of this agreement must be signed by the senior elected official of the jurisdiction and the director and will be maintained on file by the agency.

Political subdivisions of the state, including their fire service agencies, are also authorized to develop and enter into mutual aid agreements with other jurisdictions outside the state for reciprocal emergency aid and assistance in case of emergencies too extensive to be dealt with unassisted. This shall also include emergencies outside the state in which it is geographically reasonable for a political subdivision of this state, or its fire service, to respond. Copies of the agreements shall be sent to the agency and shall be consistent with the State Comprehensive Emergency Management Plan and program, and in time of emergency it shall be the duty of each local emergency management organization to render assistance in accordance with the provisions of such mutual aid agreements.

The Governor may enter into compacts with any state or group of states if he finds that joint action with that state or group of states is desirable in meeting common intergovernmental problems of emergency management planning or emergency prevention, mitigation, response and recovery.

Political subdivisions of the state, including their fire service agencies, shall not be liable for the death of or any injury to persons, or damage to property and all other protections provided in Section 33-15-21(a), as a result of mutual aid agreements entered into pursuant to this section.

Employees of a political subdivision of this state shall have the powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment and all other benefits provided by Section 33-15-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-10; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 10; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 10; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 10; Laws, 2006, ch. 374, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2015).

§ 33-15-21.
Immunity.

Neither the state nor any political subdivision thereof, nor other agencies, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, the agents, employees, or representatives of any of them engaged in any emergency management activities, while complying with or attempting to comply with this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this article, shall be liable for the death of or any injury to persons, or damage to property, as a result of such activity. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this article, or under the workmen’s compensation law, or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons or providing assistance to persons during or in recovery from an actual, impending, mock or practice attack or any man-made, technological or natural disaster, together with his successors in interest, if any, shall not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about such real estate or premises by virtue of its use for emergency management purposes, or loss of, or damage to, the property of such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-11; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 11; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-23.
Funds.

For the purpose of paying any expenses of its local emergency management organization, or for paying any expenses of the emergency management program, any board of supervisors of a county or any governing body of a municipality is authorized to expend any available funds from the general fund of such county or municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-12; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 12; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-25.
Matching funds.

The Governor of the State of Mississippi is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government for the purpose of matching any federal funds that may be made available for emergency management purposes, which shall include purchasing emergency management equipment and supplies, to the state on a matching basis. Provided, that no agreement shall obligate the state for an amount greater than the appropriation available for such purpose. The state’s portion of the purchase price of any emergency management equipment may be made available from any appropriation made for such purposes.

Any county board of supervisors or municipal governing body may enter into agreement with the federal government with approval of the State Director of Emergency Management for matching funds which may be made available for emergency management purposes, which shall include purchasing emergency management equipment and supplies, by such county or municipality in conjunction with any federal matching program and funds may be expended from the general fund of such county or municipality or from such other funds as may be available to such county or municipality for emergency management purposes in order to provide the county or municipal portion of funds necessary to carry out such matching agreement.

The agency may withhold from any county board of supervisors, municipality or not-for-profit entity a portion or all of a subgrant whenever the agency determines that the county, municipality or not-for-profit entity owes a refund on any past subgrant project that was not completed as required.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-13; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 13; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 13; Laws, 1983, ch. 420, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 197; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 11; Laws, 2002, ch. 475, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 33-15-27.
Authority to accept services, gifts, grants and loans.

Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof shall offer to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting with the consent of the Governor and through its governing body, may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the Governor of the state or governing body of such political subdivision, may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

Whenever any person, firm or corporation shall offer to the state or to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting through its governing body may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the Governor of the state or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-14; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 14; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-29.
Utilization of existing services and facilities.

In carrying out the provisions of this article, the Governor and the executive officers or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof to the maximum extent practicable, and the officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies are directed to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor and to the emergency management organizations of the state or such subdivisions upon request.

State agencies in carrying out their assigned disaster or emergency assignments shall be reimbursed their expenses for emergency or disaster-related duties which may include the payment of overtime and the employment of temporary personnel by such agencies in the same manner as authorized in Sections 33-15-301 et seq., 43-41-17 [repealed] and 43-41-319 [repealed], and as provided by Section 43-41-701 [repealed].

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-15; Laws, 1942, ch. 206; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 15; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 15; Laws, 1983, ch. 420, § 6; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 33-15-31.
Orders, rules and regulations.

The governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state and other agencies designated or appointed by the Governor are authorized and empowered to make, amend, and rescind such orders, rules, and regulations as may be necessary for emergency management purposes and to supplement the carrying out of the provisions of this article, but not inconsistent with any orders, rules and regulations promulgated by the Governor or by any state agency exercising a power delegated to it by him.

All orders, rules, and regulations promulgated by the Governor, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency or by any political subdivision or other agency authorized by this article to make orders, rules and regulations, shall have the full force and effect of law, when, in the event of issuance by the Governor, or any state agency, a copy thereof is filed in the office of the Secretary of State, or, if promulgated by a political subdivision of the state or agency thereof, when filed in the office of the clerk of the political subdivision or agency promulgating the same. All existing laws, ordinances, rules and regulations inconsistent with the provisions of this article, or of any order, rule, or regulation issued under the authority of this article, shall be suspended during the period of time and to the extent that such conflict, disaster or emergency exists.

In order to attain uniformity so far as practicable throughout the country in measures taken to aid emergency management, all action taken under this article and all orders, rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, shall be taken or made with due consideration to the orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations, and requests of federal authorities relevant thereto and, to the extent permitted by law, shall be consistent with such orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations and requests.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-16; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 16; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 16; Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 33-15-33.
Political activity prohibited.

No individual employed by or for an organization for emergency management established under the authority of this article shall, while acting under authority of his position or representing himself in his official capacity, participate in any form of political activity, and no such organization shall be employed directly or indirectly for political purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-17; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 17; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 37, eff from and after May 9, 1980.

§33-15-35. [Codes, 1942, § 8610-18; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 18; Laws, 1962, ch. 482, § 3]

§ 33-15-37.
Enforcement.

It shall be the duty of every organization for emergency management established pursuant to this article and of the officers thereof to execute and enforce such orders, rules and regulations as may be made by the Governor under authority of this article. Each such organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules and regulations made by the Governor, or under his authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-19; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 19; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-39.
Peace officers.

Any county or municipality, through its governing board, and with the approval of the sheriff in a county, or the chief of police in a municipality, may confer upon members of emergency management auxiliary police units, the powers of peace officers, subject to such restrictions as shall be imposed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-20; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 20; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-41.
Arrests.

Any emergency management auxiliary policeman who has had conferred upon him the power of a peace officer, as provided in Section 33-15-39 and when in full and distinctive uniform or displaying a badge or other insignia of authority, may arrest without a warrant any person violating or attempting to violate in such officer’s presence any order, rule, or regulation made pursuant to this article. This authority shall be limited to those rules and regulations which affect the public generally.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-21; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 21; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-43.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this article or any rule, order, or regulation made pursuant to this article shall, upon conviction thereof, be punishable by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment for not exceeding six (6) months or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-22; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1952).

§ 33-15-45.
Local emergency management councils continued.

All local emergency management councils heretofore created under the provisions of former Sections 8610-8620, Mississippi Code of 1942, are hereby continued, subject to the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 23; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved May 9, 1980).

§ 33-15-47.
Liberality of construction.

This article shall be construed liberally in order to effectuate its purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8610-25; Laws, 1952, ch. 312, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1952).

§ 33-15-49.
Emergency use of state or local personnel and equipment authorized; limitation of liability.

In the event an impending enemy attack, an enemy attack, or a man-made, technological or natural disaster occurs within the state or within any portion of it and a proclamation is issued by the governing authorities of the county, the governing authorities of the municipality, the office of the Governor of the state or the President of the United States declaring such affected areas to be disaster areas, the governing authorities of any county or municipality adversely affected by such disaster may:

Use county or municipally owned equipment and such public employees as necessary to venture onto private property to aid in removing debris and to prevent further damage to such property at the request of the property owners;

Use county or municipally owned equipment and such public employees as necessary to venture onto private property to remove debris and to perform any other necessary and needed services to prevent the spread of disease or any other health hazard to the community at large.

If the governing authorities of such adversely affected counties or municipalities are unable to perform such necessary and needed functions with their own equipment and personnel, they may request aid from other counties and municipalities not adversely affected by such impending enemy attack, enemy attack, or man-made, technological or natural disaster, and capable and willing to furnish needed services.

Provided, however, if the Governor determines that the governing authorities of such adversely affected counties or municipalities still lack sufficient equipment and personnel under such circumstances to perform such functions, any state agency or instrumentality, when directed by the Governor, is authorized to enter upon publicly or privately owned land or water and to use state-owned equipment and state employees as necessary to clear or remove debris and wreckage. Whenever the Governor provides for clearance of debris or wreckage pursuant hereto, employees of the designated state agencies or instrumentalities are authorized to enter upon private or public land or water and perform any tasks necessary to the removal or clearance operation. Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence or bad faith, any state employee or agent complying with and performing duties pursuant hereto shall not be liable for death or injury to persons or damage to property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 22; Laws, 1998, ch. 338, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 33-15-51.
Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund.

The Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency. Monies paid into the fund shall be derived from Sections 27-35-309(3)(b)(i) and (ii) and 27-35-309(3)(d). All monies deposited therein shall be available for expenditure, transfer and allocation by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency for state and local preparedness activities directly related to the Grand Gulf Nuclear Generating Plant, with at least fifty percent (50%) of the monies in the fund earmarked for use in conducting such activities in the geographic area falling within a thirty-mile radius of the plant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 524, § 3; Laws, 1990, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 12, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch 486, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 33-15-53.
State emergency coordination officers.

The head of each state department, agency or commission shall select from within such agency a person to be designated as the emergency coordination officer for the agency and an alternate. The emergency coordination officer is responsible for coordinating with the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency on emergency preparedness issues, preparing and maintaining emergency preparedness and postdisaster response and recovery plans for such agency, maintaining rosters of personnel to assist in disaster operations and coordinating appropriate training for agency personnel. These individuals shall be responsible for ensuring that each state facility, such as a prison, office building or university, has a disaster preparedness plan that is approved by the applicable local emergency management agency or the division. The head of each agency shall notify the Governor and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency in writing of the person initially designated as the emergency coordination officer for such agency and his alternate and of any changes in persons so designated thereafter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 333, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1995.